koi/koi.aff
FLAG long
SFX O3 0 ьясӧйсянь дз
SFX O3 0 ьясӧйтӧг дз
SFX O3 0 ьясӧн дз
SFX O3 0 ьясӧс дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссӧ дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссьыд дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссьым дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссьыныд дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссьыным дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссьыныс дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссьыс дз
SFX O3 0 ьясся дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссяныд дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссяным дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссяныс дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссянь дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссяньныд дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссяньным дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссяньныс дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссяньыд дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссяньым дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссяньыс дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссяыд дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссяыс дз
SFX O3 0 ьясті дз
SFX O3 0 ьястіныд дз
SFX O3 0 ьястіным дз
SFX O3 0 ьястіныс дз
SFX O3 0 ьястіыд дз
SFX O3 0 ьястіым дз
SFX O3 0 ьястіыс дз
SFX O3 0 ьястӧ дз
SFX O3 0 ьястӧг дз
SFX O3 0 ьястӧгныд дз
SFX O3 0 ьястӧгным дз
SFX O3 0 ьястӧгныс дз
SFX O3 0 ьястӧгыд дз
SFX O3 0 ьястӧгыс дз
SFX O3 0 ьястӧм дз
SFX O3 0 ьястӧмӧсь дз
SFX O3 0 ьясыд дз
SFX O3 0 ьясыдкӧд дз
SFX O3 0 ьясыдла дз
SFX O3 0 ьясыдлӧн дз
SFX O3 0 ьясыдлы дз
SFX O3 0 ьясыдлысь дз
SFX O3 0 ьясын дз
SFX O3 0 ьясыс дз
SFX O3 0 ьясыскӧд дз
SFX O3 0 ьясысла дз
SFX O3 0 ьясыслӧн дз
SFX O3 0 ьясыслы дз
SFX O3 0 ьясыслысь дз
SFX O3 0 ьясысь дз
SFX O3 0 ъясбердса [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъяскостса [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъяспӧвстса [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъясвывса [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъясувса [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъясдорса [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъясводзса [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъясбӧрса [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъяссайса [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъясвесьтса [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъясгӧгӧрса [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъясбердса [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъяскостса [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъяспӧвстса [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъясвывса [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъясувса [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъясдорса [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъясводзса [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъясбӧрса [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъяссайса [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъясвесьтса [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъясгӧгӧрса [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ясбердса [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яскостса [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яспӧвстса [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясвывса [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясувса [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясдорса [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясводзса [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясбӧрса [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссайса [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясвесьтса [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясгӧгӧрса [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ьясбердса [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьяскостса [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьяспӧвстса [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьясвывса [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьясувса [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьясдорса [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьясводзса [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьясбӧрса [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьяссайса [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьясвесьтса [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьясгӧгӧрса [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьясбердса дз
SFX O3 0 ьяскостса дз
SFX O3 0 ьяспӧвстса дз
SFX O3 0 ьясвывса дз
SFX O3 0 ьясувса дз
SFX O3 0 ьясдорса дз
SFX O3 0 ьясводзса дз
SFX O3 0 ьясбӧрса дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссайса дз
SFX O3 0 ьясвесьтса дз
SFX O3 0 ьясгӧгӧрса дз
SFX O3 0 ъясбердсаӧсь [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъяскостсаӧсь [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъяспӧвстсаӧсь [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъясвывсаӧсь [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъясувсаӧсь [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъясдорсаӧсь [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъясводзсаӧсь [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъясбӧрсаӧсь [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъяссайсаӧсь [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъясвесьтсаӧсь [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъясгӧгӧрсаӧсь [вдлнстшжкгбпрмфхц]
SFX O3 0 ъясбердсаӧсь [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъяскостсаӧсь [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъяспӧвстсаӧсь [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъясвывсаӧсь [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъясувсаӧсь [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъясдорсаӧсь [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъясводзсаӧсь [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъясбӧрсаӧсь [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъяссайсаӧсь [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъясвесьтсаӧсь [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ъясгӧгӧрсаӧсь [^д]з
SFX O3 0 ясбердсаӧсь [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яскостсаӧсь [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яспӧвстсаӧсь [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясвывсаӧсь [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясувсаӧсь [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясдорсаӧсь [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясводзсаӧсь [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясбӧрсаӧсь [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссайсаӧсь [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясвесьтсаӧсь [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясгӧгӧрсаӧсь [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ьясбердсаӧсь [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьяскостсаӧсь [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьяспӧвстсаӧсь [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьясвывсаӧсь [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьясувсаӧсь [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьясдорсаӧсь [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьясводзсаӧсь [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьясбӧрсаӧсь [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьяссайсаӧсь [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьясвесьтсаӧсь [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьясгӧгӧрсаӧсь [чщ]
SFX O3 0 ьясбердсаӧсь дз
SFX O3 0 ьяскостсаӧсь дз
SFX O3 0 ьяспӧвстсаӧсь дз
SFX O3 0 ьясвывсаӧсь дз
SFX O3 0 ьясувсаӧсь дз
SFX O3 0 ьясдорсаӧсь дз
SFX O3 0 ьясводзсаӧсь дз
SFX O3 0 ьясбӧрсаӧсь дз
SFX O3 0 ьяссайсаӧсь дз
SFX O3 0 ьясвесьтсаӧсь дз
SFX O3 0 ьясгӧгӧрсаӧсь дз
